California, session 20252026, AB911.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Communications systems are critical to transmit information that first responders rely on during a crisis, including the restoration of telecommunications services to health care providers following a disaster. The ability of first responders to communicate must be dependable and time sensitive to help minimize the risk to life, property, and recovery during emergencies.(b) Bucket trucks are operated under various weather and geographic conditions and must restore operations during prolonged power outages. Zero-emission vehicle mandates for these trucks should not hinder a public or private entity’s ability to respond to major disruption events, including, but not limited to, severe weather, wildfires, natural disasters, and physical attacks, and to maintain reliable communications services to California communities.SEC. 2. Section 43109 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:43109. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, Article 3.4 (commencing with Section 2015) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations does not apply to an emergency telecommunications vehicle owned or purchased by an emergency telecommunications service provider that is used to participate in the federal Emergency Alert System, to provide access to 911 emergency services, or to provide wireless connectivity during service outages.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Emergency telecommunications service provider” means either of the following:(A) A public or private entity that is required to participate in the federal Emergency Alert System or to provide access to 911 emergency services.(B) A public or private entity that provides wireless connectivity services in emergencies or during other wireless connectivity services outages, including, but not limited to, providing support to the federal First Responder Network Authority and the Nationwide Public Safety Broadband Network.(2) (A) “Emergency telecommunications vehicle” means either a bucket truck or a cell on wheels unit.(B) “Bucket truck” means a vehicle configured with an affixed personnel or aerial lift system with a control platform at the end of the lift with a space for the operator to stand and work above the ground.(C) “Cell on wheels unit” means a mobile unit vehicle configuration that is equipped with telecommunications infrastructure, including, but not limited to, antennas or network equipment, that is typically mounted on a platform and that enables the rapid deployment of temporary network coverage in remote areas or during emergency situations.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________